Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 5 Permissive Closing Days, Emergency Closings, Business Restrictions, and Voluntary Liquidations

Cross references.

Taking of possession of the business and property of financial institutions by department, §

7-1-150

et seq.

Dissolution of business corporations generally, §

14-2-1401

et seq.

Forfeiture of charter and dissolution of Secretary of State corporations generally, §

14-4-160

et seq.

7-1-110.
Permissive closing days; deferral of business conducted on Saturday.

Any financial institution may remain closed one day each week in addition to Sundays and other legal holidays; and any act authorized, required, or permitted to be performed at or by any such financial institution on a day when it is closed may be performed on the next succeeding business day; and no liability or loss of rights of any kind shall result from the delay. Saturday shall not be construed to be a business day and any business conducted on Saturday may be deferred to the next succeeding business day, provided that such deferral is applicable to all business conducted by said financial institution on that day and is in accordance with a resolution adopted by the board of directors of the institution. Customers of any financial institution adopting such a deferral policy shall be notified of any such deferral of business by prominent notice posted in the lobby of the financial institution and by circularization in regular statement mailings at least 30 days prior to the effective date of any such deferral policy. Any financial institution changing its permissive closing day, temporarily or otherwise, shall post a notice of the change and the effective date thereof in a conspicuous place at each location affected by the change at least 30 days preceding the date of the change. Notwithstanding the foregoing, credit unions serving a limited membership base may establish uniform business hours and days consistent with the needs of their membership.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-501, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1714, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 2; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided that such deferral” for “provided such deferral” in the middle of the second sentence.

7-1-110.1.
Posting notice of intent to close banking location.

Except in the case of an emergency closing, before a financial institution may close a banking location, it must post at such location in a conspicuous place at least 30 days in advance of such closing a notice of intent to close. Such notice must remain posted for at least 30 consecutive days. Customers of a banking location shall be considered to have received notice if the requirements of this Code section have been met.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-110.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 1.

7-1-111.
Emergency closings.

Whenever it appears to the Governor that the welfare of this state or any region thereof or the welfare and security of any financial institution or the lives of the employees of the financial institution or the safety of the funds of depositors and property of the shareholders are endangered or placed in jeopardy by any impending or existing emergency or other catastrophe, including, but not limited to, economic crises, hurricanes, tornadoes, fire hazards, disruption or failure of utility, transportation, communication, or information systems, or civil disorders, the Governor may proclaim that an emergency exists and such state of emergency proclamation shall authorize financial institutions to elect to close. The Governor may also proclaim that any financial institution or type of financial institution shall be subject to special regulation as herein provided until the Governor, by a like proclamation, declares the period of such emergency to have terminated. The department may declare emergencies in specific cases for cause shown, and its declaration shall remain in effect until terminated by the Governor or the commissioner, whichever occurs first.

History.

Code 1933, § 14-1811, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 812, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-501, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-502, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1714, § 4; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 6/HB 184; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 1-5/HB 811.

7-1-111.1.
[Repealed] Posting notice of intent to close banking location.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-111.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 9. For present comparable provisions, see Code Section

7-1-110.1

; repealed by Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 1, effective July 1, 1999.

7-1-112.
Business restrictions.

During the period of or as a result of any financial emergency proclaimed by the Governor or declared by the department, or during any impending or existing emergency situation as described in Code Section 7-1-111, the department, in addition to all of the powers conferred upon it by law, shall have the authority to order any one or more financial institutions to restrict all or any part of their business and to limit or postpone for any length of time the payment of any amount or proportion of the deposits in any of the departments of the financial institutions as it may deem necessary or expedient. The department may further regulate the payments of such financial institutions as to time and amount, as in its opinion the interest of the public or of such financial institutions or the depositors thereof may require.

No liability or loss of any rights of any kind shall be incurred by any financial institution during any emergency period declared by the Governor or the department by reason of the delay in the payment of any item or by the return or transmission of any item or document if such delay is caused by orders of the Governor or the department, interruption of communication facilities, suspension of payments by another financial institution, war or emergency conditions, or other circumstances beyond the control of the financial institution if it exercises such diligence as the circumstances require.

History.

Code 1933, § 14-1812, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 812, § 2; Code 1933, § 41A-501, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-503, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1714, § 5; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 2.

7-1-113.
Voluntary dissolution prior to commencement of business; failure to properly file articles of dissolution; power of department to seek dissolution.

A financial institution which has not transacted any business as a financial institution other than organizational business may propose to dissolve by the affirmative vote of shareholders entitled to cast at least two-thirds of the votes which all shareholders are entitled to cast on the plan and by delivering to the department articles of dissolution which shall be executed by two duly authorized officers or shareholders under the seal of the financial institution and which shall contain:

The date of incorporation of the financial institution;

A statement that it has not transacted any business as a financial institution other than organizational business;

A statement that all liabilities of the financial institution have been paid or provided for;

A statement that all amounts received on account of capital stock and paid-in capital, less amounts disbursed for expenses, have been returned to the persons entitled thereto; and

The number of shares entitled to vote on the dissolution and the number of shares voted for and against it, respectively.

The articles of dissolution shall be delivered to the department together with the filing fee required by Code Section 7-1-862. If the department is satisfied that the financial institution has not conducted any business other than organizational business and if it finds that the articles of dissolution satisfy the requirements of this chapter, it shall deliver them with its written approval to the Secretary of State and notify the financial institution of its action. If the department shall disapprove the articles of dissolution, it shall give written notice to the financial institution of its disapproval and a general statement of the reasons for its decision. The decision of the department shall be conclusive, except as it may be subject to judicial review under Code Section 7-1-90.

If the department determines that a financial institution has not conducted any business other than organizational business and if articles of dissolution satisfying the requirements of this chapter are not delivered to the department together with the filing fee as required by Code Section 7-1-862, the department may make written demand upon the financial institution to immediately provide articles of dissolution or to provide cause why such dissolution should not be pursued directly by the department. If the financial institution fails to provide articles of dissolution as required within 60 days from the date of demand by the department, the department may seek dissolution of the financial institution in organization directly from the Secretary of State’s office.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-502, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 13; Code 1933, § 41A-504, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1714, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 917, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 518, § 2/HB 239; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 7/HB 184; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 3/HB 185.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “capital stock and paid-in capital,” for “capital stock, paid-in capital, and expense fund,” in paragraph (a)(4).

7-1-114.
Voluntary dissolution after commencement of business.

A financial institution which has commenced business may elect to dissolve voluntarily upon:

Adoption by the vote required of its shareholders under subsection (b) of this Code section of:

A plan of dissolution involving both a provision for assumption of its liabilities by another financial institution and a provision for continuance of its business if such assumption of its liabilities is not effected; or

Any other plan of dissolution providing for full payment of its liabilities; and

Approval by the department of the plan of dissolution after application for approval thereof in a manner prescribed by the department.

Adoption of the plan by the shareholders of the financial institution shall require the affirmative vote of the shareholders entitled to cast at least two-thirds of the votes which all shareholders are entitled to cast on the plan and, if any class of shareholders is entitled to vote on the plan as a class, of the holders of at least two-thirds of the outstanding shares of such class, provided that, in the case of a credit union, adoption of the plan may be made by the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the members present and entitled to vote at a meeting duly called for that purpose.

Upon receipt of an application for approval of a plan of dissolution, the department shall conduct such investigation as it may deem necessary to determine whether:

The plan satisfies the requirements of this chapter;

The plan adequately protects the interests of depositors, other creditors, and shareholders; and

If the plan involves an assumption of liabilities by another financial institution, such assumption would be consistent with adequate and sound banking and in the public interest on the basis of factors substantially similar to those set forth in Code Section 7-1-534.

Within 90 days after receipt of the application, the department shall approve or disapprove the application on the basis of its investigation and shall immediately give to the financial institution written notice of its decision and, in the event of disapproval, a general statement of the reasons for its decision. The decision of the department shall be conclusive, except as it may be subject to judicial review under Code Section 7-1-90.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 14, §§ 1, 2, 10; Code 1933, §§ 13-1501, 13-1502, 13-1510; Ga. L. 1967, p. 597, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-503, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 730, § 2; Code 1933, § 41A-505, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1714, § 3; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided that, in the case” for “provided, in the case” in the middle of subsection (b).

7-1-115.
Winding up voluntary dissolution proceedings.

The board of directors shall have full power to wind up and settle the affairs of a financial institution in voluntary dissolution proceedings.

Within 30 days after the department’s approval of voluntary liquidation and dissolution, the financial institution shall give notice of its dissolution:

By mail to each depositor and creditor (except those as to whom the liability of the financial institution has been assumed by another financial institution pursuant to the plan), including a statement of the amount shown by the books of the financial institution to be due to such depositor or creditor and a demand that any claim for a greater amount be filed with the financial institution before a specified date at least 60 days after the date of notice;

By mail to each lessee of a safe-deposit box and each customer for whom property is held in safe deposit (except those as to whom the liability of the financial institution has been assumed by another financial institution pursuant to the plan), including a demand that all property held in a safe-deposit box or held in safe deposit by the financial institution be withdrawn by the person entitled thereto before a specified date at least 60 days after the date of the notice;

By mail to each person interested in funds held in a fiduciary account or other representative capacity;

By a conspicuous posting at each office of the financial institution; and

By such publication as the department may prescribe.

As soon as feasible after the department’s approval of voluntary liquidation and dissolution, the financial institution shall resign all of its fiduciary appointments and take such action as may be necessary to settle its fiduciary accounts.

Except where liabilities are to be assumed by another financial institution:

All claims of depositors and creditors shall be paid promptly after the date specified in the notice given under paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this Code section, and unearned portions of rentals for safe-deposit boxes shall be rebated to the lessee thereof;

Safe-deposit boxes whose contents have not been removed after the date specified in the notice given under paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall be opened under the supervision of the department and the contents placed in sealed packages which, together with unclaimed property held by the financial institution in safe deposit, shall be transmitted to the department to be held by it subject to Article 5 of Chapter 12 of Title 44, provided that the department while holding such property may take such actions as it deems appropriate to protect the interests of the owner, including reducing such property to cash;

After payment of amounts due to all known depositors and creditors, unclaimed amounts due to depositors and creditors shall be paid through the department and held by it subject to Article 5 of Chapter 12 of Title 44; and

Assets remaining after the performance of all obligations of the financial institution under this subsection and subsection (c) of this Code section shall be distributed to its shareholders according to their respective rights and preferences. Partial distributions to shareholders may be made prior to such time only if and to the extent approved by the department.

During the course of dissolution proceedings, the financial institution shall make such reports as the department may require and shall continue to be subject to the provisions of this chapter concerning examinations and investigations of financial institutions. Furthermore, during the course of a voluntary dissolution, the financial institution with the written permission of the department may elect to use provisions of Article 14 of Chapter 2 of Title 14 that are not in conflict with this chapter.

If, at any time during the course of dissolution proceedings, the department finds that the assets of the financial institution will not be sufficient to discharge its obligations, the department may then or at any time thereafter take possession of the business and property of the financial institution and complete the dissolution in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 14, §§ 3-6; Code 1933, §§ 13-1504, 13-1505, 13-1506; Ga. L. 1967, p. 597, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-504, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-506, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1714, § 3; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 7; Ga. L. 2003, p. 843, § 3; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “the owner, including” for “the owner including” near the end of paragraph (d)(2).

7-1-116.
Articles of dissolution where business commenced; procedure if not filed.

When all the liabilities of the financial institution have been discharged and all of its remaining assets have been distributed to its shareholders pursuant to Code Section 7-1-115 or its liabilities have been assumed by another financial institution, the articles of dissolution shall be signed by two duly authorized officers of the financial institution under its seal and shall contain:

The name of the financial institution and the post office address of its principal place of business;

A statement that the department has previously approved a plan to dissolve the institution and the date on which such approval was transmitted to the Secretary of State;

A statement that all liabilities of the financial institution have been discharged and that the remaining assets of the financial institution have been distributed to its shareholders or that its liabilities have been assumed as provided in this chapter; and

A statement that there are no actions pending against the financial institution.

The articles of dissolution shall be delivered to the department together with the filing fee required by Code Section 7-1-862. If the department finds that the articles satisfy the requirements of this chapter, it shall deliver its written approval to the Secretary of State with a copy of the articles of dissolution attached.

Where a financial institution fails to file articles of dissolution within 180 days after the department determines that dissolution proceedings have been completed as provided in this part, the department may cause notice to be published in accordance with this chapter to the effect that persons having claims against the financial institution should notify the department within 30 days of the date of initial publication. If the department receives no such notifications or if claims are otherwise satisfied, the department shall notify the Secretary of State that the articles of incorporation or charter are no longer valid and should be promptly canceled of record in the offices of the Secretary of State.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 14, §§ 7, 9; Code 1933, §§ 13-1507, 13-1509; Ga. L. 1967, p. 597, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-505, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-507, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1714, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 972, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 917, § 2; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 8/HB 184.

7-1-117.
Certificate of dissolution.

If all applicable fees, charges, and taxes required by law have been paid upon the receipt of the department’s approval, under Code Section 7-1-113 or 7-1-116, of the articles of dissolution, the Secretary of State shall immediately issue to the financial institution a certificate of dissolution with the approved articles of dissolution attached thereto and shall retain a copy of such certificate, the approval of the department, and the articles; and the existence of the financial institution shall cease.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 14, § 12; Code 1933, § 13-1512; Ga. L. 1967, p. 597, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-506, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-508, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1714, § 3.